Tennessee, session 114, HB0459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 43-38-1003, is amended by deleting
"or" at the end of subdivision (5), and by deleting subdivision (6) and substituting the following:
(6) The cooperative files a document with the secretary of state in which an
organizer, director, officer, member, agent, or representative of the cooperative signed
the document knowing that the document contained materially false information; or
(7) The cooperative is owned or controlled by a foreign government or foreign
nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary by the United States
secretary of commerce and specified in 15 CFR 791.4(a) or a successor regulation,
except for entities involved in transactions approved by the committee on foreign
investment in the United States.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-24-201, is amended by deleting
"or" at the end of subdivision (5), by deleting the period at the end of subdivision (6) and
substituting instead ";", and by adding the following as new subdivisions:
(7) Corporation files a document with the secretary of state in which an
incorporator, director, officer, agent, or representative of the corporation signed the
document knowing that the document contained materially false information; or
HB0459
001110
- 1 -

(8) Corporation is owned or controlled by a foreign government or foreign
nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary by the United States
secretary of commerce and specified in 15 CFR 791.4(a) or a successor regulation,
except for entities involved in transactions approved by the committee on foreign
investment in the United States.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-25-301, is amended by deleting
subdivision (5) and substituting instead the following subdivisions (5) and (6), and by
redesignating the existing subdivisions (6)-(8) accordingly:
(5) The foreign corporation files a document with the secretary of state in which
an incorporator, director, officer, agent, or representative of the foreign corporation
signed the document knowing that the document contained materially false information;
(6) The foreign corporation is owned or controlled by a foreign government or
foreign nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary by the United
States secretary of commerce and specified in 15 CFR 791.4(a) or a successor
regulation, except for entities involved in transactions approved by the committee on
foreign investment in the United States;
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-64-201, is amended by deleting
"or" at the end of subdivision (5), by deleting the period at the end of subdivision (6) and
substituting ";", and by adding the following as new subdivisions:
(7) Corporation files a document with the secretary of state in which an
incorporator, director, officer, agent, or representative of the corporation signed the
document knowing that the document contained materially false information; or
(8) Corporation is owned or controlled by a foreign government or foreign
nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary by the United States
secretary of commerce and specified in 15 CFR 791.4(a) or a successor regulation,
- 2 - 001110

except for entities involved in transactions approved by the committee on foreign
investment in the United States.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-65-301, is amended by deleting
subdivision (4) and substituting the following subdivisions (4) and (5), and by redesignating the
existing subdivisions (5)-(8) accordingly:
(4) The foreign corporation files a document with the secretary of state in which
an incorporator, director, officer, agent, or representative of the foreign corporation
signed the document knowing that the document contained materially false information;
(5) The foreign corporation is owned or controlled by a foreign government or
foreign nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary by the United
States secretary of commerce and specified in 15 CFR 791.4(a) or a successor
regulation, except for entities involved in transactions approved by the committee on
foreign investment in the United States;
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-245-301, is amended by deleting
subdivision (6) and substituting the following subdivisions (6) and (7), and by redesignating the
existing subdivision (7) accordingly:
(6) The LLC files a document with the secretary of state in which an organizer,
governor, manager, member, agent, or representative of the LLC signed the document
knowing that the document contained materially false information;
(7) The LLC is owned or controlled by a foreign government or foreign
nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary by the United States
secretary of commerce and specified in 15 CFR 791.4(a) or a successor regulation,
except for entities involved in transactions approved by the committee on foreign
investment in the United States; or
- 3 - 001110

SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-246-501, is amended by deleting
subdivision (5) and substituting the following subdivisions (5) and (6), and by redesignating the
existing subdivisions (6)-(8) accordingly:
(5) The foreign LLC files a document with the secretary of state in which an
organizer, governor, manager, member, agent, or representative of the foreign LLC
signed the document knowing that the document contained materially false information;
(6) The foreign LLC is owned or controlled by a foreign government or foreign
nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary by the United States
secretary of commerce and specified in 15 CFR 791.4(a) or a successor regulation,
except for entities involved in transactions approved by the committee on foreign
investment in the United States;
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-249-604, is amended by deleting
subdivision (6) and substituting the following subdivisions (6) and (7), and by redesignating the
existing subdivision (7) accordingly:
(6) The LLC files a document with the secretary of state in which an organizer,
director, officer, manager, member, agent, or representative of the LLC signed the
document knowing that the document contained materially false information;
(7) The LLC is owned or controlled by a foreign government or foreign
nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary by the United States
secretary of commerce and specified in 15 CFR 791.4(a) or a successor regulation,
except for entities involved in transactions approved by the committee on foreign
investment in the United States; or
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-249-908, is amended by deleting
subdivision (5) and substituting the following subdivisions (5) and (6), and by redesignating the
existing subdivisions (6)-(8) accordingly:
- 4 - 001110

(5) The foreign LLC files a document with the secretary of state in which an
organizer, director, officer, manager, member, agent, or representative of the foreign
LLC signed the document knowing that the document contained materially false
information;
(6) The foreign LLC is owned or controlled by a foreign government or foreign
nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary by the United States
secretary of commerce and specified in 15 CFR 791.4(a) or a successor regulation,
except for entities involved in transactions approved by the committee on foreign
investment in the United States;
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 61-3-811(a), is amended by
deleting subdivision (6) and substituting the following subdivisions (6) and (7), and by
redesignating the existing subdivision (7) accordingly:
(6) The limited partnership files a document with the secretary of state in which a
general partner, limited partner, agent, or representative of the limited partnership signed
the document knowing that the document contained materially false information;
(7) The limited partnership is owned or controlled by a foreign government or
foreign nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary by the United
States secretary of commerce and specified in 15 CFR 791.4(a) or a successor
regulation, except for entities involved in transactions approved by the committee on
foreign investment in the United States; or
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 61-3-1009(a), is amended by
deleting subdivision (5) and substituting the following subdivisions (5) and (6), and by
redesignating the existing subdivisions (6)-(8) accordingly:
(5) The foreign limited partnership files a document with the secretary of state in
which a general partner, limited partner, agent, or representative of the foreign limited
- 5 - 001110

partnership signed the document knowing that the document contained materially false
information;
(6) The foreign limited partnership is owned or controlled by a foreign
government or foreign nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary by
the United States secretary of commerce and specified in 15 CFR 791.4(a) or a
successor regulation, except for entities involved in transactions approved by the
committee on foreign investment in the United States;
SECTION 12. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 6 - 001110